Maine, session 132, LD1254.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §328, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2001, c. 664, §2, is amended to
read:
2. Ambulatory surgical facility. "Ambulatory surgical facility" means a facility, not
part of a hospital, that provides surgical treatment to patients not requiring hospitalization.
"Ambulatory surgical facility" does not include the offices of private physicians or dentists,
whether in individual or group practice.
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §1812-E, sub-§1, as amended by PL 1991, c. 752, §1, is further
amended to read:
1. Definition. As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise indicates,
"ambulatory surgical facility" means a facility with a primary purpose of providing elective
surgical care to a patient who is admitted to and discharged from the facility within the
same day. In order to meet this primary purpose, a facility must at least administer
anesthetic agents, maintain a sterile environment in a surgical suite and charge a facility
fee separate from the professional fee. "Ambulatory surgical facility" does not include:
A. A facility that is licensed as part of a hospital; or
B. A facility that provides services or accommodations for patients who stay
overnight;.
C. A facility existing for the primary purpose of performing terminations of
pregnancies; or
D. The private office of a physician or dentist in individual or group practice, unless
that facility or office is certified as a Medicare ambulatory surgical center.
Sec. 3. 22 MRSA §7932, sub-§9, as enacted by PL 1999, c. 384, §13, is amended
to read:
9. Ambulatory surgical facility. "Ambulatory surgical facility" means a facility with
the primary purpose of providing elective surgical care to a patient who is admitted to and
discharged from the facility within the same day. In order to meet this primary purpose, a
facility must at least administer anesthetic agents, maintain a sterile environment in a
surgical suite and share charge a facility fee separate from the professional license fee.
"Ambulatory surgical facility" does not include:
A. A facility that is licensed as part of a hospital; or
B. A facility that provides services or accommodations for patients who stay
overnight;.
C. A facility existing for the primary purpose of performing terminations of
pregnancies; or
D. The private office of a physician or dentist in individual or group practice, unless
the office is certified as a Medicare ambulatory surgical center.